Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12. Partnerships
[Repealed]

§§79-12-1 through79-12-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1207, eff from and after January 1, 2007.

§79-12-1. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-3. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§79-12-5. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§79-12-7. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]

§79-12-9. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 5, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-11. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 6; Laws, 1995, ch. 353 § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-13. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 7, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-15. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 8, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-17. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 9, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-19. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 10, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-21. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 11, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-23. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 12, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-25. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 13, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-27. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 14, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-29. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 15; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§79-12-31. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 16, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-33. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 17, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-35. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 18; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-37. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 19, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-39. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 20, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-41. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 21, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-43. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 22, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-45. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 23, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-47. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 24, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-49. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 25, eff and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-51. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 26, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-53. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 27, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-55. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 28, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-57. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 29, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-59. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 30, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-61. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 31, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-63. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 32, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-65. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 33, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-67. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 34; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-69. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 35; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-71. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 36; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-73. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 37, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-75. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 38, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-77. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 39, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-79. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 40; Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-81. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 41, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-83. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 42, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-85. [Laws, 1976, ch. 407, § 43, eff from and after April 1, 1977.]

§79-12-87. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§79-12-89. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-91. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-93. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-95. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-97. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-99. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-101. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-103. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-105. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-107. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-109. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 20; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§79-12-111. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-113. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-115. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-117. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§79-12-119. [Laws, 1995, ch. 353, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

Former §§ 79-12-1 through 79-12-119 related to the Mississippi Uniform Partnership Law. For similar present provisions, see the Uniform Partnership Act, §§ 79-13-101 et seq.

Mississippi Limited Partnership Act, see §§ 79-14-101 et seq.

Alabama Code, §§ 10-8A-101 through 10-8A-1109.

Arkansas Code Annotated, §§ 4-46-101 through 4-46-1207.

Florida Annotated Statutes, §§ 620.81001 through 620.9902.

Georgia Code Annotated, §§ 14-8-1 through 14-8-64.

North Carolina General Statutes, §§ 59-31 through 59-73.

South Carolina Code Annotated, §§ 33-41-10 through 33-41-1330.

Tennessee Code Annotated, §§ 61-1-101 through 61-1-1208.

Texas Annotated Statutes, Article §§ 152.001 through 152.914.

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership §§ 1 et seq.

Jurisdictions adopting Uniform Partnership Law, see Am. Jur. 2d Desk Book, Item No. 124.

68 C.J.S., Partnership §§ 1 et seq.